District of Columbia statutes.
16-1102

Failure of tenant to give notice to landlord.

If a tenant, on whom a complaint in ejectment is served, fails to give notice thereof, without delay, to his landlord or the agent of the landlord, he shall forfeit and pay to the landlord the value of three years’ full rent of the premises, to be recovered by a civil action.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 564, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1102.
1973 Ed., § 16-1102.